District of Columbia statutes.
22-1832

Forced labor.

(a)

It is unlawful for an individual or a business knowingly to use coercion to cause a person to provide labor or services.

(b)

It is unlawful for an individual or a business knowingly to place or keep any person in debt bondage.

Oct. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-239, § 102, 57 DCR 5405
This section is referenced in § 14-311, § 22-1836, § 22-1837, and § 22-1840.